Louisiana, session 2026, HB890.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The Legislature hereby finds the following:
A. Pursuant to Article IX, Section 1of the Constitution of Louisiana, the
State has an affirmative duty to protect, conserve, and replenish natural resources,
including navigable waters and submerged lands.
B. Lake Maurepas and Lake Pontchartrain are navigable waters held in
public trust and the submerged lands within these lakes provide essential benthic
habitat, fisheries productivity, sediment stabilization, and water quality functions.
C. Industrial trenching, anchoring, platform installation, dredging, sediment
displacement, and geophysical or seismic survey activities may disturb benthic
substrate, mobilize contaminants, and alter sediment transport and it is necessary to
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-298 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 890
ensure that such activities do not result in permanent impairment of submerged lands
or long-term degradation of benthic productivity.
Section 2. R.S. 49:214.43 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§214.43. Submerged lands; protection standard
A. The requirements of this Section are in addition to and shall not replace
or limit any other requirement applicable to coastal use permits.
B. This Section shall apply to any coastal use permit application for the
following activities or uses in, on, or beneath submerged lands of Lake Maurepas or
Lake Pontchartrain:
(1) Pipeline trenching or burial.
(2) Platform construction, pile driving, or anchoring systems.
(3) Dredging or sediment displacement.
(4) Geophysical or seismic survey activities.
C. (1) A coastal use permit for any activity provided for in Subsection A of
this Section shall not be issued unless the department makes written findings,
supported by competent scientific evidence, that each of the following are true.
(a) Disturbance of submerged lands has been minimized to the maximum
extent practicable, considering cost, existing technology, and project design
constraints, consistent with project purpose.
(b) The activity will not result in permanent alteration of lake bottom
contours beyond natural seasonal variability.
(c) Sediment transport patterns will not be measurably altered in a manner
that will contribute to erosion, channelization, or persistent turbidity increases when
evaluated in light of existing a reasonably foreseeable similar activities within the
affected basin.
(d) Concentrations of heavy metals or hydrocarbons in disturbed sediments
will not exceed established ecological screening levels following disturbance.
(e) Benthic biological productivity within the disturbed area is reasonably
expected, based on best available scientific evidence, to recover to pre-disturbance
levels within five years following completion of construction or survey activity.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-298 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 890
(2) The applicant shall bear the burden of demonstrating compliance with
each criterion of this Subsection.
(3) The department shall make separate written findings addressing each
criterion required by this Subsection and shall cite specific scientific data, modeling
results, independent review findings, or other evidence contained within the
administrative record supporting each determination.
(4) If the department determines that one or more of the criteria of this
Subsection cannot be satisfied based on the administrative record, the permit shall
be denied.
D. An application for a coastal use permit for any activity or use provided
for in Subsection A of this Section shall not be deemed complete unless it includes
the following documentation:
(1) High-resolution benthic habitat mapping of the proposed disturbance area
and adjacent buffer.
(2) Sediment core sampling sufficient to characterize substrate composition
and stability.
(3) Laboratory testing of sediments for mercury, lead, cadmium, arsenic,
chromium, nickel, and petroleum hydrocarbons.
(4) Sediment elutriate testing simulating disturbance.
(5) Sediment transport and hydrodynamic modeling sufficient to evaluate
contour restoration and trench stability.
(6) For seismic or geophysical surveys, a detailed description of survey
methods, anchoring practices, vessel operations, and anticipated substrate
interaction.
E. Applications subject to this Section shall undergo independent scientific
review. Independent reviewers shall be selected solely by the department and may
include qualified marine scientists or geologists from Louisiana public universities
or other neutral experts.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-298 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 890
(1) The applicant shall deposit funds sufficient to cover reasonable and
actual costs of independent review into a restricted escrow account administered by
the department.
(2) The applicant shall not select reviewers or have any control over their
review.
(3) The department shall respond in writing to findings of independent
review prior to permit issuance.
F.(1) Public hearing and record development. Prior to the issuance of a final
decision under this Section, the department shall conduct at least one public hearing
in the parish or region most directly affected by the proposed activity.
(2) Notice of the hearing shall be provided not less than thirty days prior to
the hearing date and shall include notice of availability of all application materials,
scientific modeling, sediment analyses, and independent review findings.
(3) The hearing shall provide an opportunity for the submission of oral and
written comments from any member of the public, including scientific and technical
testimony, which shall be included in the administrative record.
(4) In its final decision, the department shall respond in writing to all
material scientific or technical issues raised at the hearing and shall explain the basis
for accepting or rejecting such evidence.
G. Administrative record integrity. The administrative record shall include
all documentation, data, modeling results, independent review findings, public
comments, and written responses relied upon by the department in making its
determination under this Section.
H. For the purposes of this Section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Ecological screening levels" means sediment contaminant concentration
thresholds protective of benthic organisms as established by rule of the department
or by reference to recognized federal sediment quality guidelines, including but not
limited to National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) Effects Range
Low (ERL) benchmarks or equivalent scientifically recognized standards.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-298 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 890
(2) "Pre-disturbance levels" means baseline physical and biological
conditions documented through site-specific sampling conducted prior to
construction or survey activity.
(3) "Permanent alteration" means alteration persisting beyond five years
following completion of the permitted activity.
I. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to regulate matters exclusively
within federal jurisdiction.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any coastal use permit
application for which a final permit has not been issued as of the effective date of this Act.
Section 4. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.